Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1104
Public power districts; municipal operation; employees' rights respected.

Any municipality assuming the management of the distribution system of any public power district under the provisions of sections 70-1101 to 70-1103 shall take over and employ all of the employees of the district theretofore operating such property on the same salary, terms and conditions as their previous employment, including their rights of seniority, pension and retirement plan without prejudice to any of such rights.

Laws 1963, c. 398, § 5, p. 1271.